test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ren_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - reņ: # Noun 67 'eng /est renn/fin' - full paradigm
     reņ+N+Sg+Nom: reņ
     reņ+N+Sg+Gen: reņ
     reņ+N+Sg+Par: reņņõ
     reņ+N+Sg+Dat: reņņõn
     reņ+N+Sg+Ins: reņņõks
     reņ+N+Sg+Ill: reņņõ
     reņ+N+Sg+Ela: reņštõ
     reņ+N+Pl+Nom: rēņid
     reņ+N+Pl+Gen: rēņid
     reņ+N+Pl+Par: rēņidi
     reņ+N+Pl+Dat: rēņidõn
     reņ+N+Pl+Ins: rēņidõks
     reņ+N+Pl+Ill: rēņiž
     reņ+N+Pl+Ela: rēņist
